Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-290
Derivative action; complaint; requirements.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 58.